Hawaii statutes.
§386-123 Failure to give security for
compensation; penalty; injunction. If an employer fails to comply with
section 386-121, the employer shall be liable for a penalty of not less than
$250 or of $10 for each employee for every day during which such failure
continues, whichever sum is greater, to be recovered in an action brought by
the director in the name of the State, and the amount so collected shall be
paid into the special compensation fund created by section 386-151. The
director may, however, in the director's discretion, for good cause shown,
remit all or any part of the penalty in excess of $250, provided the employer
in default complies with section 386-121. With respect to such actions, the
attorney general or any county attorney or public prosecutor shall prosecute
the same if so requested by the director.

In addition, if any employer is in default
under section 386-121 for a period of thirty days, the employer may be
enjoined, by the circuit court of the circuit in which the employer's principal
place of business is located, from carrying on the employer's business anywhere
in the State so long as the default continues, such action for injunction to be
prosecuted by the attorney general or any county attorney if so requested by
the director. [L 1963, c 116, pt of §1; Supp, §97-122; HRS §386-123; gen ch
1985; am L 1988, c 37, §5]

Rules of Court

Injunctions, see HRCP rule 65.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next